Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB532.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 260.850 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 260.850 to 260.869:
(1) "Batch" means a specific quantity of medicinal hemp product that is uniform,
intended to meet specifications for identity, purity, strength, and composition, and
produced during a specified time period according to a single manufacturing
record during the same cycle of manufacture;
(2) "Batch number" means a distinctive group of letters, numbers, or symbols, or
any combination thereof, from which the complete history of the processing,
manufacturing, packaging, labeling, and holding of a batch of medicinal hemp
product can be determined, including but not limited to:
(a) Source of the hemp material;
(b) Cultivation inputs used, including fertilizers, pesticides, soil amendments,
and water sources;
(c) Manufacturing date and location;
(d) Laboratory test results;
(e) Distribution records; and
(f) Any remediation processes applied, including methods, materials used, and
rationale;
(3) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture;
(4)[(2)] "Cultivating" means planting, growing, and harvesting a plant or crop;
(5)[(3)] "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Agriculture;
(6)[(4)] "Handling" means possessing or storing hemp for any period of time on
premises owned, operated, or controlled by a person licensed to cultivate or process
hemp. "Handling" also includes possessing or storing hemp in a vehicle for any
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
period of time other than during its actual transport from the premises of a licensed
person to cultivate or process hemp to the premises of another licensed person;
(7)[(5)] "Hemp" or "industrial hemp":
(a) Means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the
seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts,
and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis; and
(b) Does not include medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010;
(8)[(6)] "Hemp products" or "industrial hemp products":
(a) Means products derived from, or made by, processing hemp plants or plant
parts;[ and]
(b) Includes medicinal hemp products; and
(c) Does not include medicinal cannabis products as defined in KRS 218B.010;
(9) "Individual biological variability" means differences in individual human
response to hemp-derived products based on genetic, metabolic, dietary,
environmental, age-related, hormonal, medication-interaction, or health-related
factors;
(10)[(7)] "Licensee" means an individual or business entity possessing a license issued
by the department under the authority of this chapter to grow, handle, cultivate,
process, or market hemp or hemp products;
(11)[(8)] "Marketing" means promoting or selling a product within the Commonwealth,
in another state, or outside of the United States. "Marketing" includes efforts to
advertise and gather information about the needs or preferences of potential
consumers or suppliers;
(12) "Medical grade" means a market-based quality designation indicating
compliance with enhanced manufacturing, testing, and labeling standards
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
established in Section 2 of this Act;
(13) "Medicinal hemp product":
(a) Means a nonintoxicating dietary supplement intended for human
consumption that:
1. Is derived from, or made by, processing hemp;
2. Contains only naturally occurring cannabinoids, terpenes, and
flavonoids; and
3. Has a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than
three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Any cannabinoids that are not naturally found or produced in hemp;
2. Cannabinoids that are synthesized outside of the plant; or
3. Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010;
(14) "Natural agricultural variability"
(a) Means differences in cannabinoid, terpene, flavonoid, mineral, or other
constituent profiles resulting from lawful agricultural practices, soil
composition, climate, cultivar selection, water source, or harvest timing;
and
(b) Is inherent to agriculture and shall not be construed as adulteration,
contamination, or noncompliance;
(15)[(9)] "Processing" means converting an agricultural commodity into a marketable
form;
(16) "Purity of production" means the integrity and transparency of cultivation and
processing practices, including soil composition, water sources, cultivation
inputs, and postharvest handling, recognizing that agricultural context influences
product chemistry;
(17) "Population-level harm" means documented, reproducible evidence of adverse
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
health outcomes affecting a significant portion of consumers beyond isolated
incidents or anecdotal reports;
(18) "Remediation":
(a) Means any postharvest chemical or physical process used to reduce,
remove, or alter contaminants or naturally occurring constituents of hemp;
and
(b) Includes but is not limited to dilution, chemical treatment, chromatography,
distillation, or other processes applied after harvest to modify product
composition; and
(19)[(10)] "University" means an accredited institution of higher education located in the
Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 260.850 TO 260.869 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each batch of medicinal hemp product shall be assigned a specific batch number
by the processor. Batch records shall be maintained for a minimum of three (3)
years and shall be made available to the department upon request.
(2) (a) Each batch shall undergo independent testing to determine:
1. Cannabinoid profile;
2. Compliance with delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration
restrictions as established in KRS 260.850 to 260.869; and
3. The presence or absence of:
a. Pesticides;
b. Microbial contaminants;
c. Residual solvents; or
d. Mycotoxins.
(b) Testing shall be performed by a lab that:
1. Is not owned, operated, or financially controlled by the manufacturer
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
of the product being tested;
2. Is accredited to ISO/IEC 17025 standards as established by the
International Organization for Standardization;
3. Has demonstrated proficiency in cannabis and hemp testing; and
4. Maintains accountability for accuracy, methodological integrity, and
transparency in testing practices;
(c) Natural agricultural variability in raw hemp material shall not be deemed
adulteration, contamination, or noncompliance;
(d) Producers shall not be penalized for documented laboratory error or
misconduct beyond their control;
(e) Results of independent testing shall be made publicly accessible through
electronic means by the processor. Publicly available results shall include:
1. Batch number;
2. Date of testing;
3. Laboratory name and accreditation;
4. Results for all required testing parameters;
5. Whether the product passed or failed;
6. Notation if the product was derived from remediated hemp material;
and
7. A statement acknowledging natural agricultural variability; and
(f) Medicinal hemp product processors, handlers, or marketers shall not be
held liable for documented laboratory error or misconduct beyond their
control.
(3) Each medicinal hemp product packaged for retail sale shall have affixed to its
label:
(a) The product's identity as a hemp-derived product, including whether the
processor designates the product as medical grade;
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
(b) The batch number of all batches of medicinal hemp product within the
container;
(c) In clearly legible and conspicuous form, language identifying the product's
intended use as a dietary supplement;
(d) The product's cannabinoid content per serving;
(e) The product's cannabinoid profile, including the product's percentage of
tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol contents;
(f) Contact information for the manufacturer;
(g) An ingredient list;
(h) An expiration date;
(i) A scannable quick response (QR) code or web address that provides direct
access to the batch-specific details;
(j) A disclosure indicating if the product has been subject to remediation; and
(k) Any required federal disclaimers, including but not limited to:
1. "This product has not been evaluated by the Food and Drug
Administration";
2. "This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any
disease"; and
3. "Individual results may vary based on biological, dietary, and lifestyle
factors".
(4) A medicinal hemp product shall not, through marketing and advertising or
directly on the product's label:
(a) Claim the product is intended to treat any disease;
(b) Claim the product is available through prescription only;
(c) Be marketed directly or indirectly to minors, including but not limited to
marketing and product containers substantially resembling existing candy
or candy products; or
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
(d) Make false or misleading claims, including but not limited to:
1. Misrepresenting the cannabinoid profile in the product;
2. Overstating or understating the cannabinoid content beyond an
acceptable variance range of higher or lower than ten percent (10%);
3. Making false claims regarding organic certification or production
methods; or
4. Failing to disclose remediation when required.
(5) Any product regulated under this section, including any product designated as
medical grade, shall not require a prescription, physician authorization, or
physician recommendation.
(6) The department shall not establish, maintain, or require participation in any
patient registry, consumer database, or tracking system for the purchase of
medicinal hemp products, including those designated as medical grade.
Section 3. KRS 260.862 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other powers vested in it by law, the department shall have the
authority and power to promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) License persons who wish to cultivate, handle, process, or market hemp;
(b) License persons who wish to handle, process, or market medicinal hemp
products, but the department shall not limit the number of medicinal hemp
product licenses;
(c) Prescribe rules for a university's participation in, or affiliation with, any hemp
program;
(d)[(c)] Prescribe sampling and testing procedures to ensure that hemp and hemp
products cultivated, handled, processed, or marketed under the authority of
KRS 260.850 to 260.869[this section] do not exceed the concentration levels
defined in federal law as it currently exists or as it may be subsequently
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
amended;
(e)[(d)] Define classes or categories of hemp products that are eligible for sale,
transfer, or distribution to members of the public;[ and]
(f)[(e)] Establish a schedule of nonrefundable fees for applicants and licensees;
and
(g) 1. Establish quality and safety standards for the handling, processing, or
marketing of medicinal hemp products, including tracking and
auditing procedures for batches of medicinal hemp products,
including standards applicable to products designated as medical
grade.
2. In developing quality and safety standards, the department shall:
a. Consider diverse sources of evidence, including agronomic
science, real-world use data, independently replicated studies,
and traditional agriculture practices;
b. Consider funding sources and conflicts of interest for relied-
upon research;
c. Avoid reliance solely on speculative risk, isolated studies, or
industry-dominated research absent demonstrable population-
level harm;
d. Distinguish natural agricultural variability from adulteration or
contamination;
e. Acknowledge individual biological variability in evaluating
adverse event reports or consumer feedback; and
f. Consider the impact of proposed standards on small farmer
viability and market competition.
3. In developing quality and safety standards, the department shall not:
a. Penalize producers for natural agricultural variability or
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
documented laboratory error;
b. Favor large-scale remediation operations over quality
agricultural products;
c. Impose compliance barriers designed to consolidate market
power or exclude small farmers; or
d. Expand regulatory authority beyond the explicit boundaries
established in KRS 260.850 to 260.869.[.]
(2) (a) The department shall have exclusive authority over the regulation of the
processing, handling, manufacturing, and licensing of medicinal hemp
products.
(b) In evaluating applications for medicinal hemp products licenses, the
department shall give priority to:
1. Existing licensed hemp growers and processors;
2. Kentucky-based agricultural operations and family farms;
3. Applicants with demonstrated experience in hemp cultivation or
agricultural commodity production;
4. Applicants whose business plans emphasize purity of production and
minimal remediation; and
5. Applicants whose business plans promote rural economic development
and job creation in Kentucky.
(c) The department shall not impose license caps, exclusive of licenses, or
requirements that favor vertical integration or large-scale operators over
small farms and family farms.
(3) (a) A person shall not[No person shall] cultivate, handle, process, or market
hemp in the Commonwealth unless the person holds a license issued by the
department.
(b) Any person seeking to cultivate hemp shall provide to the department the
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
legal description and global positioning coordinates sufficient for locating the
fields or greenhouses to be used to grow hemp.
(c) Any person seeking to cultivate or process hemp or medicinal hemp products
shall provide to the department prior written consent allowing representatives
of the department, the Department of Kentucky State Police, and other state
and local law enforcement agencies to enter onto all premises where hemp or
hemp products are[ is] cultivated, processed, or stored for the purpose of
conducting physical inspections or ensuring compliance with the requirements
of KRS 260.850 to 260.869 and administrative regulations promulgated by the
department.
(d) An applicant for a license issued by the department shall submit to and pay for
an annual criminal background check conducted by the Department of
Kentucky State Police or another state or federal law enforcement agency or
another entity selected by the department.
(e) A person[No person] who has been convicted of any felony or any drug-
related misdemeanor or violation in the previous ten (10) years from the date
of application shall not be eligible to obtain a license, provided, however,
that:
1. A person who was growing hemp lawfully with a license, registration,
or authorization under a pilot program authorized by Section 7606 of the
Agricultural Act of 2014, 7 U.S.C. sec. 5940, shall be eligible to obtain
a license to grow hemp; and
2. A person who was lawfully growing hemp under Section 7606 of the
Agricultural Act of 2014 before December 20, 2018, and was convicted
prior to December 20, 2018, shall be eligible to obtain a license to grow
hemp.
(f) Any person seeking to handle or process a medicinal hemp product shall
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1716
comply with current good manufacturing, packaging, labeling, or holding
practices as defined in 21 C.F.R. pt. 111.
Section 4. This Act may be cited as the Kentucky Medicinal Hemp Farmers
Act.
Section 5. Whereas it is imperative that Kentucky's hemp cultivators,
processors, handlers, and marketers are capable of producing medicinal hemp products,
including products designated as medical grade, within the growing season and are
prepared to participate promptly if any federal purchasing, reimbursement, or
demonstration pathway applicable to hemp-derived products becomes available, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed